test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-olma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - олма: # Noun 'an apple/omena'
     олма+N+Sg+Nom: олма
     олма+N+Sg+Gen: олман
     олма+N+Sg+Acc: олмам
     олма+N+Sg+Com: олмаге
     олма+N+Sg+Dat: олмалан
     олма+N+Sg+Ine: олмашты
     олма+N+Sg+Ill: [олмаш, олмашкы]
     олма+N+Sg+Lat: олмаэш
     олма+N+Sg+Cmpr: олмала
     олма+N+Sg+Abe: олмаде
     олма+N+Pl+Nom: олмавлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Gen: олмавлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Acc: олмавлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+Com: олмавлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+Dat: олмавлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Ine: олмавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+Ill: [олмавлӓшкӹ, олмавлӓш]
     олма+N+Pl+Lat: олмавлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+Cmpr: олмавлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Abe: олмавлӓде
     
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: олмаэм
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen+SO/PC: олмаэмӹн
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc+SO/PC: олмаэмӹм
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com+SO/PC: олмаэмге
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat+SO/PC: олмаэмлӓн
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat+SO/CP: олмаланем
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ine+SO/CP: олмаштем
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ile+SO/CP: олмашкем
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat+SO/CP: олмаэшем
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cmpr+SO/PC: олмаэмлӓ 
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abe+SO/PC: олмаэмде

     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom+SO/PN: олмаэмвлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom+SO/NP: олмавлӓэм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэмӹн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэмӹм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэмге
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэмлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ine+SO/NCP: олмавлӓштем
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ine+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ill+SO/NCP: олмавлӓшкем
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ill+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat+SO/NCP: олмавлӓэшем
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cmpr+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэмлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cmpr+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэмде
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe+SO/PNC: олмаэмвлӓде

     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: олмаэт
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen+SO/PC: олмаэтӹн
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc+SO/PC: олмаэтӹм
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com+SO/PC: олмаэтге
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat+SO/PC: олмаэтлӓн
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat+SO/CP: олмаланет
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ine+SO/CP: олмаштет
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ile+SO/CP: олмашкет
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat+SO/CP: олмаэшет
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cmpr+SO/PC: олмаэтлӓ 
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abe+SO/PC: олмаэтде

     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom+SO/PN: олмаэтвлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom+SO/NP: олмавлӓэт
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэтӹн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэтӹм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэтге
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэтлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ine+SO/NCP: олмавлӓштет
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ine+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ill+SO/NCP: олмавлӓшкет
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ill+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat+SO/NCP: олмавлӓэшет
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cmpr+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэтлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cmpr+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abe+SO/NPC: олмавлӓэтде
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abe+SO/PNC: олмаэтвлӓде

     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: олмажы
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen+SO/PC: олмажын
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc+SO/PC: олмажым
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com+SO/PC: олмажыге
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat+SO/PC: олмажылан
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat+SO/CP: олмаланжы
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ine+SO/CP: олмаштыжы
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ile+SO/CP: олмашкыжы
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat+SO/CP: олмаэшыжы
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cmpr+SO/PC: олмажыла 
     олма+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abe+SO/PC: олмажыде

#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom+SO/PN: олмажывлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom+SO/NP: олмавлӓжӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen+SO/NPC: олмавлӓжӹн
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc+SO/NPC: олмавлӓжӹм
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com+SO/NPC: олмавлӓжӹге
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat+SO/NPC: олмавлӓжӹлӓн
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine+SO/NCP: олмавлӓштӹжӹ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill+SO/NCP: олмавлӓшкӹжӹ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat+SO/NCP: олмавлӓэшӹжӹ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cmpr+SO/NPC: олмавлӓжӹлӓ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cmpr+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe+SO/NPC: олмавлӓжӹде
#     олма+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe+SO/PNC: олмажывлӓде

     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: олмана
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen+SO/PC: олманан
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc+SO/PC: олманам
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com+SO/PC: олманаге
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat+SO/PC: олманалан
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat+SO/CP: олмаланна
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Ine+SO/CP: олмаштына
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Ile+SO/CP: олмашкына
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat+SO/CP: олмаэшына
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cmpr+SO/PC: олманала 
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abe+SO/PC: олманаде

     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom+SO/PN: олманавлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom+SO/NP: олмавлӓнӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen+SO/NPC: олмавлӓнӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen+SO/PNC: олманавлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc+SO/NPC: олмавлӓнӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc+SO/PNC: олманавлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com+SO/NPC: олмавлӓнӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com+SO/PNC: олманавлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat+SO/NPC: олмавлӓнӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat+SO/PNC: олманавлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ine+SO/NCP: олмавлӓштӹнӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ine+SO/PNC: олманавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ill+SO/NCP: олмавлӓшкӹнӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ill+SO/PNC: олманавлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat+SO/NCP: олмавлӓэшӹнӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat+SO/PNC: олманавлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cmpr+SO/NPC: олмавлӓнӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cmpr+SO/PNC: олманавлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abe+SO/NPC: олмавлӓнӓде
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abe+SO/PNC: олманавлӓде

     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: олмада
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen+SO/PC: олмадан
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc+SO/PC: олмадам
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com+SO/PC: олмадаге
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat+SO/PC: олмадалан
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat+SO/CP: олмаланда
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Ine+SO/CP: олмаштыда
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Ile+SO/CP: олмашкыда
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat+SO/CP: олмаэшыда
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cmpr+SO/PC: олмадала 
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abe+SO/PC: олмададе

     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom+SO/PN: олмадавлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom+SO/NP: олмавлӓдӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen+SO/NPC: олмавлӓдӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc+SO/NPC: олмавлӓдӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com+SO/NPC: олмавлӓдӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat+SO/NPC: олмавлӓдӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ine+SO/NCP: олмавлӓштӹдӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ine+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ill+SO/NCP: олмавлӓшкӹдӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ill+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat+SO/NCP: олмавлӓэшӹдӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cmpr+SO/NPC: олмавлӓдӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cmpr+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abe+SO/NPC: олмавлӓдӓде
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abe+SO/PNC: олмадавлӓде

     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: олмашты
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen+SO/PC: олмаштын
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc+SO/PC: олмаштым
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com+SO/PC: олмаштыге
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat+SO/PC: олмаштылан
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat+SO/CP: олмаланшты
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Ine+SO/CP: олмаштышты
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Ile+SO/CP: олмашкышты
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat+SO/CP: олмаэшышты
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cmpr+SO/PC: олмаштыла 
     олма+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abe+SO/PC: олмаштыде

#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom+SO/PN: олмаштывлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom+SO/NP: олмавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen+SO/NPC: олмавлӓштӹн
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc+SO/NPC: олмавлӓштӹм
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com+SO/NPC: олмавлӓштӹге
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat+SO/NPC: олмавлӓштӹлӓн
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ine+SO/NCP: олмавлӓштӹштӹ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ine+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ill+SO/NCP: олмавлӓшкӹштӹ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ill+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat+SO/NCP: олмавлӓэшӹштӹ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cmpr+SO/NPC: олмавлӓштӹлӓ
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cmpr+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abe+SO/NPC: олмавлӓштӹде
#     олма+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abe+SO/PNC: олмаштывлӓде
